DI-754

DIAGNOSTICS - ENGINEIMMOBILISERSYSTEM (2UZ -FE)
CIRCUIT INSPECTION '
DTC B2785/99 | IG Switch ON Malfunction
DTC B2786/99 | IG Switch OFF Malfunction
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
B2785/99  Shortcircuitin IG switch circuit < (Gewitch
«1G switch adheres to ON position swite
* Opencircuitin |G switch circuit ) EFI Main Relay
B2786/99 |G switch adheres to OFF position »Wirehamess
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

1 Check voltage between terminals + B and E1 of Engine and ECT ECU connec-
tors.

PREPARATION:
(@) Remove the glove compartment.
ON (b)  Turn ignition switch ON.
@ : CHECK:
U‘ |{‘WWWWWVWJ HJ Measure voltage between terminals + B and E1 of Engine and
E1 F el ECT ECU connectors.
+B OK:

@@ Voltage: 9 - 14V
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OK Proceed to next circuit inspection shown in
problem symptoms table (See page DI-753).

NG
~_—

2 | Check for open in harness and connector between terminal E1 of Engine and
ECT ECU and body ground (See page IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

3 | Check EFI main relay (Marking: EFI).

NG> Replace EFI main relay.
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4 Check EFI fuse.

nents connected to EFI fuse.

NG> Check for short in all the harness and compo-

@

5 | Check for open in harness and connector between EFl main relay (Marking : EFI)
and battery, EFI main relay (Marking : EFI) and Engine and ECT ECU (See page
IN-35).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

6 Check IGN fuse.

PREPARATION:
Remove the IGN fuse from the driver side J/B.
CHECK:
Check continuity of IGN fuse.
OK:
Continuity

IGN Fuse

nents connected to IGN fuse.

NG> Check for short in all the harness and compo-
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7 | Check ignition switch (See page BE-20).

8 [ Check for open circuit in harness and connector between IG switch and EFI
main relay, EFl main relay and body ground (See page IN-35).

NG> Replace ignition switch.

NG> Repair or replace wire harness and connector.

OK
~_—

Replace Engine and ECT ECU.

LAND CRUISER (W/G) (RM616E)



